Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,120
Subpart definitions.

(MBCA 8.60) In sections
21-2,120 to 21-2,123:

(1) Director's conflicting
interest transaction means a transaction effected or proposed to be effected
by the corporation or by an entity controlled by the corporation:

(i) To which, at the
relevant time, the director is a party;

(ii) Respecting which, at the relevant time, the director
had knowledge and a material financial interest known to the director; or

(iii) Respecting which,
at the relevant time, the director knew that a related person was a party
or had a material financial interest.

(2) Control, including the term controlled by, means
(i) having the power, directly or indirectly, to elect or remove a majority
of the members of the board of directors or other governing body of an entity,
whether through the ownership of voting shares or interests, by contract,
or otherwise, or (ii) being subject to a majority of the risk of loss from
the entity's activities or entitled to receive a majority of the entity's
residual returns.

(3)
Relevant time means (i) the time at which directors' action respecting the
transaction is taken in compliance with section 21-2,122, or (ii) if the transaction
is not brought before the board of directors of the corporation, or its committee,
for action under section 21-2,122, at the time the corporation, or an entity
controlled by the corporation, becomes legally obligated to consummate the
transaction.

(4)
Material financial interest means a financial interest in a transaction that
would reasonably be expected to impair the objectivity of the director's judgment
when participating in action on the authorization of the transaction.

(5) Related person means:

(i) The director's spouse;

(ii) A child, stepchild,
grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, sibling, stepsibling, half-sibling,
aunt, uncle, niece, or nephew, or spouse of any thereof, of the director or
of the director's spouse;

(iii)
An individual living in the same home as the director;

(iv) An entity, other
than the corporation or an entity controlled by the corporation, controlled
by the director or any person specified in subdivisions (5)(i) through (iii)
of this section;

(v)
A domestic or foreign (A) business or nonprofit corporation, other than the
corporation or an entity controlled by the corporation, of which the director
is a director, (B) unincorporated entity of which the director is a general
partner or a member of the governing body, or (C) individual, trust, or estate
for whom or of which the director is a trustee, guardian, personal representative,
or like fiduciary; or

(vi)
A person that is, or an entity that is controlled by, an employer of the director.

(6) Fair to the corporation
means, for purposes of subdivision (b)(3) of section 21-2,121, that the transaction
as a whole was beneficial to the corporation, taking into appropriate account
whether it was (i) fair in terms of the director's dealings with the corporation
and (ii) comparable to what might have been obtainable in an arm's length
transaction, given the consideration paid or received by the corporation.

(7) Required disclosure
means disclosure of (i) the existence and nature of the director's conflicting
interest and (ii) all facts known to the director respecting the subject matter
of the transaction that a director free of such conflicting interest would
reasonably believe to be material in deciding whether to proceed with the
transaction.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 120.
January 1, 2017